Florida, session 2026, SB1334.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 185 186 Section 1.âSubsections (6), (43), and (47) of section 187 97.021, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 188 97.021âDefinitions.âFor the purposes of this code, except 189 where the context clearly indicates otherwise, the term: 190 (6)ââBallotâ or âofficial ballotâ means a printed sheet of 191 paper containing contests, including offices and candidates, 192 constitutional amendments, and other public measures, upon which 193 a voterâs selections will be marked by using the pen or marker 194 recommended by the voting system vendor. The term includes a 195 voter-verifiable paper output upon which a voterâs selections 196 are marked by a voter interface device that meets voter 197 accessibility requirements for individuals with disabilities 198 under s. 301 of the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 and s. 199 101.56062 when used in reference to: 200 (a)ââElectronic or electromechanical devicesâ means a 201 ballot that is voted by the process of electronically 202 designating, including by touchscreen, or marking with a marking 203 device for tabulation by automatic tabulating equipment or data 204 processing equipment. 205 (b)ââMarksense ballotsâ means that printed sheet of paper, 206 used in conjunction with an electronic or electromechanical vote 207 tabulation voting system, containing the names of candidates, or 208 a statement of proposed constitutional amendments or other 209 questions or propositions submitted to the electorate at any 210 election, on which sheet of paper an elector casts his or her 211 vote. 212 (43)ââVoter interface deviceâ means any device that 213 communicates voting instructions and ballot information to a 214 voter and allows the voter to select and vote for candidates and 215 issues. A voter interface device may not be used to tabulate 216 votes. Any vote tabulation must be based upon a subsequent scan 217 of the marked marksense ballot or the voter-verifiable paper 218 output after the voter interface device process has been 219 completed. 220 (47)ââVoting systemâ means a method of casting and 221 processing votes which that functions wholly or partly by use of 222 electromechanical or electronic apparatus or by use of marksense 223 ballots and includes, but is not limited to, the equipment, 224 hardware, firmware, and software; the ballots; the procedures 225 for casting and processing votes; and the programs, operating 226 manuals, and supplies; and the reports, printouts, and other 227 documentation software necessary for the systemâs operation. 228 Section 2.âSection 97.051, Florida Statutes, is amended to 229 read: 230 97.051âOath upon registering.âA person registering to vote 231 must subscribe to the following oath: âI do solemnly swear (or 232 affirm) that I will protect and defend the Constitution of the 233 United States and the Constitution of the State of Florida, that 234 I am qualified to register as an elector under the Constitution 235 and laws of the State of Florida, and that all information 236 provided in this application is true. I further do solemnly 237 swear (or affirm) that I am a United States citizen and that I 238 have carefully reviewed the instructions for completing the 239 Florida Voter Registration Application. I understand that if I 240 have provided false information on this application, I could be 241 subject to criminal penalties, fines, or imprisonment for 242 perjury, and, if not a United States citizen, deportation from 243 the United States.â 244 Section 3.âParagraph (v) is added to subsection (2) of 245 section 97.052, Florida Statutes, to read: 246 97.052âUniform statewide voter registration application.â 247 (2)âThe uniform statewide voter registration application 248 must be designed to elicit the following information from the 249 applicant: 250 (v)âDocumentation required by the Election Assistance 251 Commission or federal law. 252 Section 4.âSubsection (4) of section 97.0525, Florida 253 Statutes, is amended to read: 254 97.0525âOnline voter registration.â 255 (4)(a)âThe online voter registration system must shall 256 compare the Florida driver license number or Florida 257 identification number submitted pursuant to s. 97.052(2)(n) with 258 information maintained by the Department of Highway Safety and 259 Motor Vehicles to confirm that the name and date of birth on the 260 application are consistent with the records of the Department of 261 Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles. 262 (b)âIf the applicantâs name and date of birth are 263 consistent with the records of the Department of Highway Safety 264 and Motor Vehicles and the applicantâs legal status as a United 265 States citizen is verified by the records of the Department of 266 Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles, the online voter registration 267 system must shall transmit, using the statewide voter 268 registration system maintained pursuant to s. 98.035, the 269 applicantâs registration application, along with the digital 270 signature of the applicant on file with the Department of 271 Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles, to the supervisor of 272 elections. The applicantâs digital signature satisfies the 273 signature requirement of s. 97.052(2)(q). The applicantâs legal 274 status as a United States citizen must be recorded in the 275 statewide voter registration system. 276 (c)âIf the applicantâs name and date of birth cannot be 277 verified by the records of the Department of Highway Safety and 278 Motor Vehicles, or if the applicant indicated that he or she has 279 not been issued a Florida driver license or Florida 280 identification card, the online voter registration system must 281 shall populate the applicantâs information, except for the 282 applicantâs personal identifying number, into a printable voter 283 registration application pursuant to s. 97.052(2) which and 284 direct the applicant may to print, complete, sign, and date, the 285 application and deliver the application to the supervisor of 286 elections for disposition pursuant to s. 97.073. 287 (d)âIf the applicantâs legal status as a United States 288 citizen cannot be verified by the records of the Department of 289 Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles, the online voter registration 290 system must notify the supervisor of elections that the 291 applicantâs legal status as a United States citizen could not be 292 verified and transmit, using the statewide voter registration 293 system maintained pursuant to s. 98.035, the applicantâs 294 registration application, along with the digital signature of 295 the applicant on file with the Department of Highway Safety and 296 Motor Vehicles, to the supervisor of elections. The applicantâs 297 digital signature satisfies the signature requirement of s. 298 97.052(2)(q). 299 (e)âIf the applicant indicates that he or she has not been 300 issued a Florida driver license or identification card, or 301 chooses to use the system to prepopulate an application to 302 print, sign, and deliver to the supervisor, the online voter 303 registration system must populate the applicantâs information 304 into a printable voter registration application pursuant to s. 305 97.052(2) and direct the applicant to print, sign, and date the 306 application and deliver the application to the supervisor for 307 disposition under s. 97.073. 308 Section 5.âSubsections (2) and (6) of section 97.053, 309 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 310 97.053âAcceptance of voter registration applications.â 311 (2)âA voter registration application is complete and 312 becomes the official voter registration record of that applicant 313 when all information necessary to establish the applicantâs 314 eligibility pursuant to s. 97.041 is received by a voter 315 registration official and verified pursuant to subsection (6). 316 Except as provided in subsection (6), if the applicant fails to 317 complete his or her voter registration application on or before 318 prior to the date of book closing for an election, then such 319 applicant is shall not be eligible to vote in that election. 320 (6)(a)âA voter registration application, including an 321 application with a change in name, address, or party 322 affiliation, may be accepted as valid only after the department 323 has verified the authenticity or nonexistence of the Florida 324 driver license number, the Florida identification card number, 325 or the last four digits of the social security number provided 326 by the applicant. If a completed voter registration application 327 has been received by the book-closing deadline but the Florida 328 driver license number, the Florida identification card number, 329 or the last four digits of the social security number provided 330 by the applicant cannot be verified, the applicant must shall be 331 notified that the number cannot be verified and that the 332 applicant must provide evidence to the supervisor sufficient to 333 verify the authenticity of the applicantâs Florida driver 334 license number, Florida identification card number, or last four 335 digits of the social security number. If the applicant provides 336 the necessary evidence, the supervisor must shall place the 337 applicantâs name on the registration rolls as an active voter. 338 If the applicant has not provided the necessary evidence or the 339 number has not otherwise been verified prior to the applicant 340 presenting himself or herself to vote, the applicant must shall 341 be provided a provisional ballot. The provisional ballot must 342 shall be counted only if the number is verified by the end of 343 the canvassing period or if the applicant presents evidence to 344 the supervisor of elections sufficient to verify the 345 authenticity of the applicantâs Florida driver license number, 346 Florida identification card number, or last four digits of the 347 social security number no later than 5 p.m. of the second day 348 following the election. 349 (b)âIf the application is made to update the voterâs record 350 with a change of address, name, or party affiliation, such 351 change is retroactive to the date the application was initially 352 received once the required sufficient evidence is verified. 353 (c)âImmediately after registration or an update to a 354 registration, the supervisor of elections shall verify the 355 voterâs legal status as a United States citizen using available 356 state and federal governmental sources and, if applicable, 357 initiate notice pursuant to s. 98.075(7). 358 Section 6.âSubsections (11) and (13) of section 97.057, 359 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 360 97.057âVoter registration by the Department of Highway 361 Safety and Motor Vehicles.â 362 (11)âThe Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles 363 shall enter into an agreement with the department to match 364 information in the statewide voter registration system with 365 information in the database of the Department of Highway Safety 366 and Motor Vehicles to the extent required to verify the accuracy 367 of the Florida driver license number, Florida identification 368 number, or last four digits of the social security number and 369 the legal status as a United States citizen, provided on 370 applications for voter registration as required in s. 97.053. 371 The department shall also include in the statewide voter 372 registration system the type of documentary proof that the 373 licensee or cardholder provided as evidence of United States 374 citizenship. 375 (13)âNotwithstanding declinations to register or to update 376 a voter registration pursuant to paragraph (2)(b), the 377 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles, in accordance 378 with s. 98.093(8), shall must assist the Department of State in 379 regularly identifying changes in residence address on the 380 Florida driver license or Florida identification card or changes 381 in the Florida driver license or Florida identification card 382 number of such persons who may be voters of a voter. The 383 Department of State must report each such change to the 384 appropriate supervisor of elections who must change the voterâs 385 registration records in accordance with s. 98.065(4). 386 Section 7.âSubsection (1) of section 98.045, Florida 387 Statutes, is amended to read: 388 98.045âAdministration of voter registration.â 389 (1)âELIGIBILITY OF APPLICANT.â 390 (a)âThe supervisor shall must ensure that any eligible 391 applicant for voter registration is registered to vote and that 392 each application for voter registration is processed in 393 accordance with law. The supervisor shall determine whether a 394 voter registration applicant is ineligible based on any of the 395 following: 396 1.(a)âThe failure to complete a voter registration 397 application as specified in s. 97.053. 398 2.(b)âThe applicant is deceased. 399 3.(c)âThe applicant has been convicted of a felony for 400 which his or her voting rights have not been restored. 401 4.(d)âThe applicant has been adjudicated mentally 402 incapacitated with respect to the right to vote and such right 403 has not been restored. 404 5.(e)âThe applicant does not meet the age requirement 405 pursuant to s. 97.041. 406 6.(f)âThe applicant is not a United States citizen. 407 7.(g)âThe applicant is a fictitious person. 408 8.(h)âThe applicant has provided an address of legal 409 residence that is not his or her legal residence. 410 9.(i)âThe applicant has provided a Florida driver license 411 number, Florida identification card number, or the last four 412 digits of a social security number that is not verifiable by the 413 department. 414 (b)âIf the latest voter registration records show that a 415 new applicant was previously registered but subsequently removed 416 for ineligibility pursuant to s. 98.075(7), the supervisor must 417 verify the current eligibility of the applicant to register 418 within 10 days after receipt of such records by reviewing any 419 document provided by a governmental entity or other source to 420 determine whether the applicant remains ineligible. If the 421 supervisor determines that the applicant is ineligible, the 422 supervisor must deny the application and notify the applicant 423 pursuant to s. 97.073. 424 Section 8.âSubsection (6) and paragraph (a) of subsection 425 (7) of section 98.075, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 426 98.075âRegistration records maintenance activities; 427 ineligibility determinations.â 428 (6)âELIGIBILITY.â 429 (a)âCitizenship.âThe department shall identify those 430 registered voters who are potentially ineligible for noncitizen 431 status by comparing or receiving information from, but not 432 limited to, the Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles, 433 clerks of state and federal courts, and the United States 434 Department of Homeland Security, including as may be provided in 435 s. 98.093. The department shall review such information and make 436 an initial determination as to whether the information is 437 credible and reliable. The type of document provided or used to 438 verify United States citizenship must be recorded in the 439 statewide voter registration system. If the department 440 determines that the information is credible and reliable, the 441 department must notify the supervisor and provide a copy of the 442 supporting documentation indicating potential ineligibility of 443 the voter to be registered. Upon receipt of the notice that the 444 department has made a determination of initial credibility and 445 reliability, the supervisor must adhere to the procedures set 446 forth in subsection (7) before the removal of a registered 447 voterâs name from the statewide voter registration system. 448 (b)âAcceptable documents.âAny of the following documents 449 are acceptable as evidence of United States citizenship: 450 1.âA current and valid United States passport. 451 2.âA birth certificate from any state in the United States. 452 3.âA Consular Report of Birth Abroad provided by the United 453 States Department of State. 454 4.âA current and valid Florida driver license or Florida 455 identification card issued by the Department of Highway Safety 456 and Motor Vehicles, if such driver license or identification 457 card indicates United States citizenship. 458 5.âA naturalization certificate or certificate of 459 citizenship issued by the United States Department of Homeland 460 Security. Alternatively, a certificate number or an alien 461 registration number may be provided to allow a state or local 462 election official to verify United Stated citizenship. 463 6.âA current and valid photo identification issued by the 464 Federal Government or the state which indicates United States 465 citizenship. 466 7.âAn order from a federal court granting United States 467 citizenship. 468 8.âIf the applicantâs legal name is different from the name 469 that appears on one of the documents specified in this 470 subparagraph, official legal documentation providing proof of 471 legal name change. 472 473 The type of document provided or used to verify citizenship must 474 be recorded in the statewide voter registration system. 475 (c)âOther bases for ineligibility.âOTHER BASES FOR 476 INELIGIBILITY.âSubsections (2)-(5) do not limit or restrict the 477 department or the supervisor in his or her duty to act upon 478 direct receipt of, access to, or knowledge of information from 479 any governmental entity that identifies a registered voter as 480 potentially ineligible. If the department or supervisor receives 481 information from any governmental entity other than those 482 identified in subsections (2)-(5) that a registered voter is 483 ineligible because the voter is deceased, adjudicated a 484 convicted felon without having had his or her voting rights 485 restored, adjudicated mentally incapacitated without having had 486 his or her voting rights restored, does not meet the age 487 requirement pursuant to s. 97.041, is not a United States 488 citizen, is a fictitious person, or has listed an address that 489 is not his or her address of legal residence, the supervisor 490 must adhere to the procedures set forth in subsection (7) before 491 the removal of the name of a registered voter who is determined 492 to be ineligible from the statewide voter registration system. 493 (7)âPROCEDURES FOR REMOVAL.â 494 (a)âIf the supervisor receives notice or information 495 pursuant to subsections (4)-(6), the supervisor of the county in 496 which the voter is registered must: 497 1.âNotify the registered voter of his or her potential 498 ineligibility by mail within 7 days after receipt of notice or 499 information. The notice must include: 500 a.âA statement of the basis for the registered voterâs 501 potential ineligibility and a copy of any documentation upon 502 which the potential ineligibility is based. Such documentation 503 must include any conviction from another jurisdiction determined 504 to be a similar offense to murder or a felony sexual offense, as 505 those terms are defined in s. 98.0751. 506 b.âA statement that failure to respond within 30 days after 507 receipt of the notice may result in a determination of 508 ineligibility and in removal of the registered voterâs name from 509 the statewide voter registration system. 510 c.âA return form that requires the registered voter to 511 admit or deny the accuracy of the information underlying the 512 potential ineligibility for purposes of a final determination by 513 the supervisor. 514 d.âA statement that, if the voter is denying the accuracy 515 of the information underlying the potential ineligibility, the 516 voter has a right to request a hearing for the purpose of 517 determining eligibility. 518 e.âInstructions for the registered voter to contact the 519 supervisor of elections of the county in which the voter is 520 registered if assistance is needed in resolving the matter. 521 f.âInstructions for seeking restoration of civil rights 522 pursuant to s. 8, Art. IV of the State Constitution and 523 information explaining voting rights restoration pursuant to s. 524 4, Art. VI of the State Constitution following a felony 525 conviction, if applicable. 526 g.âA list of acceptable documents or evidence of United 527 States citizenship which, if provided or used to verify the 528 voter as a United States citizen, must be recorded in the 529 statewide voter registration system: 530 (I)âA current and valid United States passport. 531 (II)âA birth certificate from any state in the United 532 States. 533 (III)âA Consular Report of Birth Abroad provided by the 534 United States Department of State. 535 (IV)âA current and valid Florida driver license or Florida 536 identification card issued by the Department of Highway Safety 537 and Motor Vehicles, if such driver license or identification 538 card indicates United States citizenship. 539 (V)âA naturalization certificate or a certificate of 540 citizenship issued by the United States Department of Homeland 541 Security. Alternatively, a certificate number or an alien 542 registration number may be provided to allow a state or local 543 election official to verify United States citizenship. 544 (VI)âA current and valid photo identification issued by the 545 Federal Government or the state which indicates United States 546 citizenship. 547 (VII)âAn order from a federal court granting United States 548 citizenship. 549 (VIII)âIf the applicantâs legal name is different from the 550 name that appears on one of the documents specified in this sub 551 subparagraph, official legal documentation providing proof of 552 legal name change. 553 h.âThe following statement: âIf you attempt to vote at an 554 early voting site or your normal election day polling place, you 555 will be required to vote a provisional ballot. If you vote by 556 mail, your ballot will be treated as a provisional ballot. In 557 either case, your ballot may not be counted until a final 558 determination of eligibility is made. If you wish for your 559 ballot to be counted, you must contact the supervisor of 560 elections office within 2 days after the election and present 561 evidence that you are eligible to vote.â 562 2.âIf the mailed notice is returned as undeliverable, the 563 supervisor must, within 14 days after receiving the returned 564 notice, either publish notice once in a newspaper of general 565 circulation in the county in which the voter was last registered 566 or publish notice on the countyâs website as provided in s. 567 50.0311 or on the supervisorâs website, as deemed appropriate by 568 the supervisor. The notice must contain the following: 569 a.âThe voterâs name and address. 570 b.âA statement that the voter is potentially ineligible to 571 be registered to vote. 572 c.âA statement that failure to respond within 30 days after 573 the notice is published may result in a determination of 574 ineligibility by the supervisor and removal of the registered 575 voterâs name from the statewide voter registration system. 576 d.âAn instruction for the voter to contact the supervisor 577 no later than 30 days after the date of the published notice to 578 receive information regarding the basis for the potential 579 ineligibility and the procedure to resolve the matter. 580 e.âAn instruction to the voter that, if further assistance 581 is needed, the voter should contact the supervisor of elections 582 of the county in which the voter is registered. 583 f.âA statement that, if the voter denies the accuracy of 584 the information underlying the potential ineligibility, the 585 voter has a right to request a hearing for the purpose of 586 determining eligibility. 587 g.âThe following statement: âIf you attempt to vote at an 588 early voting site or your normal election day polling place, you 589 will be required to vote a provisional ballot. If you vote by 590 mail, your ballot will be treated as a provisional ballot. In 591 either case, your ballot may not be counted until a final 592 determination of eligibility is made. If you wish for your 593 ballot to be counted, you must contact the supervisor of 594 elections office within 2 days after the election and present 595 evidence that you are eligible to vote.â 596 3.âIf a registered voter fails to respond to a notice 597 pursuant to subparagraph 1. or subparagraph 2., the supervisor 598 must make a final determination of the voterâs eligibility 599 within 7 days after expiration of the voterâs timeframe to 600 respond. If the supervisor determines that the voter is 601 ineligible, the supervisor must remove the name of the 602 registered voter from the statewide voter registration system 603 within 7 days. The supervisor shall notify the registered voter 604 of the supervisorâs determination and action. 605 4.âIf a registered voter responds to the notice pursuant to 606 subparagraph 1. or subparagraph 2. and admits the accuracy of 607 the information underlying the potential ineligibility, the 608 supervisor must, as soon as practicable, make a final 609 determination of ineligibility and remove the voterâs name from 610 the statewide voter registration system. The supervisor shall 611 notify the registered voter of the supervisorâs determination 612 and action. 613 5.âIf a registered voter responds to the notice issued 614 pursuant to subparagraph 1. or subparagraph 2. and denies the 615 accuracy of the information underlying the potential 616 ineligibility but does not request a hearing, the supervisor 617 must review the evidence and make a determination of eligibility 618 no later than 30 days after receiving the response from the 619 voter. If the supervisor determines that the registered voter is 620 ineligible, the supervisor must remove the voterâs name from the 621 statewide voter registration system upon such determination and 622 notify the registered voter of the supervisorâs determination 623 and action and that the removed voter has a right to appeal a 624 determination of ineligibility pursuant to s. 98.0755. If such 625 registered voter requests a hearing, the supervisor must send 626 notice to the registered voter to attend a hearing at a time and 627 place specified in the notice. The supervisor shall schedule and 628 issue notice for the hearing within 7 days after receiving the 629 voterâs request for a hearing and shall hold the hearing no 630 later than 30 days after issuing the notice of the hearing. A 631 voter may request an extension upon showing good cause by 632 submitting an affidavit to the supervisor as to why he or she is 633 unable to attend the scheduled hearing. Upon hearing all 634 evidence presented at the hearing, the supervisor shall make a 635 determination of eligibility within 7 days. If the supervisor 636 determines that the registered voter is ineligible, the 637 supervisor must remove the voterâs name from the statewide voter 638 registration system and notify the registered voter of the 639 supervisorâs determination and action and that the removed voter 640 has a right to appeal a determination of ineligibility pursuant 641 to s. 98.0755. 642 Section 9.âSubsection (8) of section 98.093, Florida 643 Statutes, is amended to read: 644 98.093âDuty of officials to furnish information relating to 645 deceased persons, persons adjudicated mentally incapacitated, 646 persons convicted of a felony, and persons who are not United 647 States citizens.â 648 (8)âDEPARTMENT OF HIGHWAY SAFETY AND MOTOR VEHICLES.âThe 649 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles shall furnish 650 weekly to the department the following information: 651 (a)âInformation identifying those persons whose names have 652 been removed from the Florida driver license or Florida 653 identification card database during the preceding week because 654 they have been licensed or been issued an identification card in 655 another state. The information must contain the personâs name, 656 last known Florida address, date of birth, sex, last four digits 657 of his or her social security number, and Florida driver license 658 number or Florida identification card number and, if available, 659 the address and the state in which the person is now licensed. 660 (b)âInformation identifying those persons who during the 661 preceding week presented evidence of non-United States 662 citizenship upon being issued a new or renewed Florida driver 663 license or Florida identification card. The information must 664 contain the personâs name; address; date of birth; last four 665 digits of the social security number, if applicable; Florida 666 driver license number or Florida identification card number, as 667 available; and alien registration number or other legal status 668 identifier. 669 (c)âInformation identifying those persons who during the 670 preceding week presented evidence of United States citizenship 671 upon being issued a new, renewed, or replacement Florida driver 672 license or Florida identification card. The information must 673 contain the personâs name; address; date of birth; last four 674 digits of the social security number, if applicable; Florida 675 driver license number or Florida identification card number, as 676 available; the type of documentary proof provided in support of 677 citizenship; and, if applicable, the alien registration number 678 or other legal status identifier. 679 (d)âInformation identifying a change in residence address 680 on the Florida driver license or Florida identification card of 681 any person who declined pursuant to s. 97.057(2) to register or 682 update his or her voter record. The information must contain the 683 personâs name; date of birth; sex; last four digits of the 684 social security number, if available; and Florida driver license 685 or Florida identification card number, as available, in order to 686 identify a voterâs registration record. The Department of State 687 must report each such change in residence address to the 688 appropriate supervisor, who must change the voterâs registration 689 records in accordance with s. 98.065(4). 690 (e)âInformation identifying new, renewed, or replacement 691 Florida driver license or Florida identification card numbers 692 issued to persons who declined pursuant to s. 97.057(2) to 693 register or update their voter record. The information must 694 contain the personâs name; date of birth; last four digits of 695 the social security number, if available; and the prior and 696 current Florida driver license or Florida identification card 697 number in order to identify a voterâs registration record. The 698 Department of State shall report the prior and current numbers 699 to the appropriate supervisor, who must update the voterâs 700 registration records and provide a notice of change to the 701 voter. 702 (f)âInformation identifying those persons for which it has 703 received official information during the preceding week that the 704 person is deceased. The information must contain the name, 705 address, date of birth, last four digits of the social security 706 number, Florida driver license number or Florida identification 707 card number, and date of death of each such person. 708 Section 10.âSection 98.094, Florida Statutes, is created to 709 read: 710 98.094âFederal jury notice.â 711 (1)âThe division shall provide lists of registered voters 712 to federal courts for the purpose of selecting jurors on the 713 condition that the jury coordinator provides notice pursuant to 714 subsection (2) regarding ineligible or potentially ineligible 715 voters. 716 (2)âThe jury coordinator shall prepare or cause to be 717 prepared a list of each person disqualified or potentially 718 disqualified as a prospective juror from jury service due to not 719 having United States citizenship, being convicted of a felony, 720 being deceased, being a nonresident of this state, or being a 721 nonresident of the county. The list must be prepared and sent to 722 the division according to the jury summons cycle used by the 723 court clerk. This section does not prevent the list from being 724 sent more frequently. The list may be provided by mail or by e 725 mail or other electronic means. 726 (3)âThe jury coordinator shall provide the division with 727 all of the following information about each disqualified juror: 728 (a)âThe full name of the disqualified juror. 729 (b)âCurrent and prior addresses, if any. 730 (c)âTelephone number, if available. 731 (d)âDate of birth. 732 (e)âThe reason the prospective juror was disqualified. 733 (4)âThe division shall provide the information to the 734 respective supervisor in the county of residence for the 735 disqualified juror for the supervisor to initiate, as may be 736 applicable, registration list maintenance pursuant to s. 98.065 737 or eligibility maintenance pursuant to s. 98.075(7). 738 Section 11.âSubsection (1) of section 101.151, Florida 739 Statutes, is amended to read: 740 101.151âSpecifications for ballots.â 741 (1)(a)âMarksense Ballots must shall be printed on paper of 742 such thickness that the printing cannot be distinguished from 743 the back and must shall meet the specifications of the voting 744 system that will be used to tabulate the ballots. 745 (b)âPolling places and early voting sites may employ a 746 ballot-on-demand production system to print individual marksense 747 ballots, including provisional ballots, for eligible electors. 748 Ballot-on-demand technology may be used to produce marksense 749 vote-by-mail, early voting, and election-day ballots. 750 Section 12.âSubsection (4) of section 101.5606, Florida 751 Statutes, is amended to read: 752 101.5606âRequirements for approval of systems.âNo 753 electronic or electromechanical voting system shall be approved 754 by the Department of State unless it is so constructed that: 755 (4)âFor systems using marksense ballots, It accepts a 756 rejected ballot pursuant to subsection (3) if a voter chooses to 757 cast the ballot, but records no vote for any office that has 758 been overvoted or undervoted. 759 Section 13.âSection 101.56075, Florida Statutes, is amended 760 to read: 761 101.56075âVoting methods.âFor the purpose of designating 762 ballot selections, all voting must be by official marksense 763 ballot, using a pen or marker recommended by the voting system 764 vendor. Persons with disabilities may vote using marking device 765 or a voter interface device that produces a voter-verifiable 766 paper output and meets the voter accessibility requirements for 767 individuals with disabilities under s. 301 of the federal Help 768 America Vote Act of 2002 and s. 101.56062. 769 Section 14.âSection 101.5608, Florida Statutes, is amended 770 to read: 771 101.5608âVoting at the polls by electronic or 772 electromechanical method; procedures.â 773 (1)âEach voter elector desiring to vote must shall be 774 identified to the clerk or inspector of the election as a duly 775 qualified voter elector of such election and must shall sign his 776 or her name on the precinct register or other form or device 777 provided by the supervisor. The inspector shall compare the 778 signature with the signature on the identification provided by 779 the voter elector. If the inspector is reasonably sure that the 780 person is entitled to vote, the inspector must shall provide the 781 person with a ballot. 782 (2)âWhen an electronic or electromechanical voting system 783 uses utilizes a ballot card or marksense ballot, the following 784 procedures must shall be followed: 785 (a)âAfter receiving a ballot from an inspector, the voter 786 elector shall, without leaving the polling place, retire to a 787 booth or compartment and mark the ballot. After marking his or 788 her ballot, the voter must elector shall place the ballot in a 789 secrecy envelope so that the ballot will be deposited in the 790 tabulator without exposing the voterâs choices. 791 (b)âAny voter who spoils his or her ballot or makes an 792 error may return the ballot to the election official and secure 793 another ballot, except that in no case shall a voter be 794 furnished more than three ballots. If the vote tabulation device 795 has rejected a ballot, the ballot must shall be considered 796 spoiled and a new ballot must shall be provided to the voter 797 unless the voter chooses to cast the rejected ballot. The 798 election official, without examining the original ballot, shall 799 state the possible reasons for the rejection and shall provide 800 instruction to the voter pursuant to s. 101.5611. A spoiled 801 ballot must shall be preserved, without examination, in an 802 envelope provided for that purpose. The stub must shall be 803 removed from the ballot and placed in an envelope. 804 (c)âThe supervisor of elections shall prepare for each 805 polling place at least one ballot box to contain the ballots of 806 a particular precinct, and each ballot box must shall be plainly 807 marked with the name of the precinct for which it is intended. 808 (3)âThe Department of State shall promulgate rules 809 regarding voting procedures to be used when an electronic or 810 electromechanical voting system is of a type which does not use 811 utilize a ballot card or marksense ballot. 812 (4)âIn any election in which a write-in candidate has 813 qualified for office, the supervisor of elections shall provide 814 for write-in voting pursuant to rules adopted by the Division of 815 Elections. 816 Section 15.âSubsection (5) of section 101.5612, Florida 817 Statutes, is amended to read: 818 101.5612âTesting of tabulating equipment.â 819 (5)âAny tests involving marksense ballots pursuant to this 820 section must shall employ test ballots created by the supervisor 821 of elections using actual ballots that have been printed for the 822 election. If ballot-on-demand ballots will be used in the 823 election, the supervisor must shall also create test ballots 824 using the ballot-on-demand technology that will be used to 825 produce ballots in the election, using the same paper stock as 826 will be used for ballots in the election. 827 Section 16.âSection 101.591, Florida Statutes, is amended 828 to read: 829 101.591âVoting system automated independent vote validation 830 process; system approval; procedures audit.â 831 (1)âBefore Immediately following the certification of each 832 election, the county canvassing board or the local board 833 responsible for certifying the election shall conduct a manual 834 audit or an automated, independent vote validation audit of the 835 voting systems used in all randomly selected precincts. 836 (2)(a)âA manual audit shall consist of a public manual 837 tally of the votes cast in one randomly selected race that 838 appears on the ballot. The tally sheet shall include election 839 day, vote-by-mail, early voting, provisional, and overseas 840 ballots, in at least 1 percent but no more than 2 percent of the 841 precincts chosen at random by the county canvassing board or the 842 local board responsible for certifying the election. If 1 843 percent of the precincts is less than one entire precinct, the 844 audit shall be conducted using at least one precinct chosen at 845 random by the county canvassing board or the local board 846 responsible for certifying the election. Such precincts shall be 847 selected at a publicly noticed canvassing board meeting. 848 (b)âAn automated independent vote validation process must 849 audit shall consist of an a public automated verification of the 850 tally of the votes cast across every race that appears on the 851 ballot. The tally sheet must shall include all valid election 852 day, vote-by-mail, early voting, provisional, and overseas 853 ballots received by the start of the vote validation process in 854 all at least 20 percent of the precincts chosen at random by the 855 county canvassing board or the local board responsible for 856 certifying the election. Such precincts shall be selected at a 857 publicly noticed canvassing board meeting. 858 (b)(c)âThe division shall adopt rules for approval of an 859 automated independent vote validation audit system which provide 860 that the system, at a minimum, must be: 861 1.âCompletely independent of the primary voting system. 862 2.âFast enough to produce final vote validation audit 863 results within the timeframe prescribed in subsection (4). 864 3.âCapable of demonstrating that the ballots of record have 865 been accurately adjudicated by the automated independent vote 866 validation audit system in agreement with the vote tabulation 867 system and capable of allowing the canvassing board to manually 868 adjudicate ballots needing review. A canvassing board is not 869 precluded from reviewing a digital image of a ballot 870 corresponding to a physical paper ballot in conducting its 871 review. 872 (3)âThe canvassing board shall publish notice on the county 873 website as provided in s. 50.0311, on the supervisor of 874 electionsâ website, or once in one or more newspapers of general 875 circulation in the county post a notice of the automated 876 independent vote validation process audit, including the date, 877 time, and place, in four conspicuous places in the county and on 878 the home page of the county supervisor of elections website. 879 Such process must be open to the public. 880 (4)âThe automated independent vote validation process audit 881 must be completed and the results made public before the 882 certification of the election by each county canvassing board 883 and in accordance with s. 102.141 no later than 11:59 p.m. on 884 the 7th day following certification of the election by the 885 county canvassing board or the local board responsible for 886 certifying the election. 887 (5)âBy December 15 of each general election year, the 888 county canvassing board or the board responsible for certifying 889 the election shall provide a report with the results of the 890 automated independent vote validation process audit to the 891 Department of State in a standard format as prescribed by the 892 department pursuant to its rulemaking authority in s. 101.5911. 893 Each countyâs The report must be consolidated into one report 894 and included with the overvote and undervote report required 895 under s. 101.595(1). The report must, at a minimum, shall 896 contain all of, but is not limited to, the following items: 897 (a)âThe overall agreement accuracy of the automated 898 independent vote validation process audit. 899 (b)âA description of any problems or differences 900 discrepancies encountered. 901 (c)âThe likely cause of such problems or differences 902 discrepancies. 903 (d)âRecommended corrective action with respect to avoiding 904 or mitigating such circumstances in future elections. 905 (6)âThe department shall consolidate the county automated 906 independent vote validation results and include the results as 907 part of a post-general election report required under ss. 908 101.595 and 102.141 to the Governor, the President of the 909 Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives by 910 February 15 of each year following a general election If a 911 manual recount is undertaken pursuant to s. 102.166, the 912 canvassing board is not required to perform the audit provided 913 for in this section. 914 Section 17.âSection 101.5911, Florida Statutes, is amended 915 to read: 916 101.5911âRulemaking authority for automated independent 917 vote validation process voting system approval; audit 918 procedures.âEffective upon this act becoming a law, The 919 department of State shall adopt rules to implement the 920 provisions of s. 101.591, as amended by s. 8, chapter 2007-30, 921 Laws of Florida, which provides for the testing and approval of 922 an automated independent vote validation system, and prescribe 923 detailed automated independent vote validation process audit 924 procedures for each voting system, which must shall be uniform 925 to the extent practicable, along with the standard form for 926 automated independent vote validation process audit reports. 927 Section 18.âSection 101.595, Florida Statutes, is amended 928 to read: 929 101.595âAnalysis of overvotes and undervotes and reports of 930 voting problems.â 931 (1)âNo later than December 15 of each general election 932 year, the supervisor of elections in each county shall report to 933 the Department of State the total number of overvotes and 934 undervotes in the âPresident and Vice Presidentâ or âGovernor 935 and Lieutenant Governorâ race that appears first on the ballot 936 or, if neither appears, the first race appearing on the ballot 937 pursuant to s. 101.151(2), along with the likely reasons for 938 such overvotes and undervotes and other information as may be 939 useful in evaluating the performance of the voting system and 940 identifying problems with ballot design and instructions which 941 may have contributed to voter confusion. This report must be 942 consolidated into one report with the audit report required 943 under s. 101.591(5). 944 (2)âThe Department of State, upon receipt of such 945 information, shall prepare a public report on the performance of 946 each type of voting system. The report must contain, but is not 947 limited to, the following information: 948 (a)âAn identification of problems with the ballot design or 949 instructions which may have contributed to voter confusion; 950 (b)âAn identification of voting system design problems; and 951 (c)âRecommendations for correcting any problems identified. 952 (3)âThe Department of State shall submit the overvote and 953 undervote analysis required in subsection (2) as part of the 954 post-general election report required under ss. 101.591 and 955 102.141 to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the 956 Speaker of the House of Representatives by February 15 of each 957 year following a general election. 958 Section 19.âSubsection (2) of section 102.111, Florida 959 Statutes, is amended to read: 960 102.111âElections Canvassing Commission.â 961 (2)âThe Elections Canvassing Commission shall meet at 8 962 a.m. on the 9th day after a primary election and at 8 a.m. on 963 the 14th day after a general election to certify the returns of 964 the election for each federal, state, and multicounty office and 965 for each constitutional amendment. The meeting must be at 9 966 a.m., except for days the Legislature convenes for organization 967 session pursuant to s. 3(a), Art. III of the State Constitution, 968 on which days the meeting must be at 8 a.m. If a member of a 969 county canvassing board that was constituted pursuant to s. 970 102.141 determines, within 5 days after the certification by the 971 Elections Canvassing Commission, that a typographical error 972 occurred in the official returns of the county, the correction 973 of which could result in a change in the outcome of an election, 974 the county canvassing board must certify corrected returns to 975 the Department of State within 24 hours, and the Elections 976 Canvassing Commission must correct and recertify the election 977 returns as soon as practicable. 978 Section 20.âSubsections (3) through (11) of section 979 102.141, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 980 102.141âCounty canvassing board; duties.â 981 (3)âThe canvass, except the canvass of absent votersâ 982 electorsâ returns and the canvass of provisional ballots, must 983 shall be made from the returns and certificates of the 984 inspectors as signed and filed by them with the supervisor, and 985 the county canvassing board may shall not change the number of 986 votes cast for a candidate, nominee, constitutional amendment, 987 or other measure submitted to the electorate of the county, 988 respectively, in any polling place, as shown by the returns. All 989 returns must shall be made to the board on or before 2 a.m. of 990 the day following any primary, general, or other election. If 991 the returns from any precinct are missing, if there are any 992 omissions on the returns from any precinct, or if there is an 993 obvious error on any such returns, the canvassing board must 994 shall order a retabulation of the returns from such precinct. 995 Before canvassing such returns, the canvassing board shall 996 examine the tabulation of the ballots cast in such precinct and 997 determine whether the returns correctly reflect the votes cast. 998 If there is a discrepancy between the returns and the tabulation 999 of the ballots cast, the tabulation of the ballots cast must 1000 shall be presumed correct and such votes must shall be canvassed 1001 accordingly. 1002 (4)(a)âThe supervisor of elections shall upload into the 1003 countyâs election management system by 7 p.m. local time on the 1004 day before the election the results of all early voting and 1005 vote-by-mail ballots that have been canvassed and tabulated by 1006 the end of the early voting period. Pursuant to ss. 101.5614(8), 1007 101.657, and 101.68(2), the tabulation of votes cast or the 1008 results of such uploads may not be made public before the close 1009 of the polls on election day. 1010 (b)âThe supervisor, on behalf of the canvassing board, 1011 shall report all early voting and all tabulated vote-by-mail 1012 results to the Department of State within 30 minutes after the 1013 polls close. Thereafter, the canvassing board shall report, with 1014 the exception of provisional ballot results, updated precinct 1015 election results by uploading such results to the department at 1016 least every 45 minutes until all results are completely 1017 reported. The supervisor of elections shall notify the 1018 department immediately of any circumstances that do not permit 1019 periodic updates as required. Results must shall be submitted in 1020 a format prescribed by the department. 1021 (5)(a)âThe canvassing board shall submit on forms or in 1022 formats provided by the division unofficial returns to the 1023 Department of State for each federal, statewide, state, or 1024 multicounty office or ballot measure no later than noon on the 1025 third day after any primary election and no later than noon on 1026 the fourth day after any general or other election. Such returns 1027 must shall include the canvass of all ballots, including write 1028 in votes, as required by subsection (2). 1029 (b)âAfter unofficial results are reported, each county 1030 shall conduct an automated independent vote validation process 1031 to confirm that the votes processed through the vote tabulation 1032 system for a candidate for any office, candidate for retention 1033 to a judicial office, or a measure appearing on the ballot do 1034 not: 1035 1.âHave a discrepancy of more than one-half of a percent 1036 when compared to the results of the automated independent vote 1037 validation system; or 1038 2.âResult in a change in the outcome of the contest. 1039 1040 The automated independent vote validation process must be 1041 completed by no later than noon on the 6th day after any primary 1042 election and no later than noon on the 7th day after any general 1043 or other election. 1044 (c)(6)âIf the county canvassing board determines, after the 1045 county conducts the automated independent vote validation 1046 process in accordance with s. 101.591 and the comparison of the 1047 results of the vote tabulation and the automated independent 1048 vote validation, that the unofficial returns may contain a 1049 counting error in which the vote tabulation system or the 1050 automated independent vote validation system failed to count 1051 votes that were properly marked in accordance with the 1052 instructions on the ballot, the county canvassing board must 1053 shall: 1054 1.(a)âCorrect the error and retabulate the affected ballots 1055 with the vote tabulation system or the automated independent 1056 vote validation system; or 1057 2.(b)âRequest that the Department of State verify the 1058 tabulation software of the affected system. When the Department 1059 of State verifies such software, the department shall compare 1060 the software used to tabulate the votes with the software filed 1061 with the department pursuant to s. 101.5607 and check the 1062 election parameters. 1063 (6)(a)âIf the comparison of the results of the vote 1064 tabulation system and the automated independent vote validation 1065 system reflects a difference as described in paragraph (b), the 1066 proper county election official under the oversight of the 1067 county canvassing board must conduct a system validation review 1068 using the images in the automated independent vote validation 1069 system of the ballots in disagreement, which review must 1070 include, but need not be limited to, a review of any clear 1071 overvotes or undervotes that appear in the automated independent 1072 vote validation system to adjudicate the voter intent of such 1073 ballots before certification of the countyâs official results. 1074 (7)âIf the unofficial returns reflect that a candidate for 1075 any office was defeated or eliminated by one-half of a percent 1076 or less of the votes cast for such office, that a candidate for 1077 retention to a judicial office was retained or not retained by 1078 one-half of a percent or less of the votes cast on the question 1079 of retention, or that a measure appearing on the ballot was 1080 approved or rejected by one-half of a percent or less of the 1081 votes cast on such measure, a system validation review must 1082 recount shall be ordered of the votes cast with respect to such 1083 office or measure. The Secretary of State is responsible for 1084 ordering such system validation reviews recounts in races that 1085 are federal or, state races that are, and multicounty and any 1086 other multicounty races. The county canvassing board or the 1087 local board responsible for certifying the election is 1088 responsible for ordering a system validation review under this 1089 subsection recounts in all other races. A system validation 1090 review recount need not be ordered with respect to the returns 1091 for any office, however, if the candidate or candidates defeated 1092 or eliminated from contention for such office by one-half of a 1093 percent or less of the votes cast for such office request in 1094 writing that a system validation review recount not be made. 1095 (a)âEach canvassing board responsible for conducting a 1096 recount shall put each marksense ballot through automatic 1097 tabulating equipment and determine whether the returns correctly 1098 reflect the votes cast. If any marksense ballot is physically 1099 damaged so that it cannot be properly counted by the automatic 1100 tabulating equipment during the recount, a true duplicate shall 1101 be made of the damaged ballot pursuant to the procedures in s. 1102 101.5614(4). Immediately before the start of the recount, a test 1103 of the tabulating equipment shall be conducted as provided in s. 1104 101.5612. If the test indicates no error, the recount tabulation 1105 of the ballots cast shall be presumed correct and such votes 1106 shall be canvassed accordingly. If an error is detected, the 1107 cause therefor shall be ascertained and corrected and the 1108 recount repeated, as necessary. The canvassing board shall 1109 immediately report the error, along with the cause of the error 1110 and the corrective measures being taken, to the Department of 1111 State. No later than 11 days after the election, the canvassing 1112 board shall file a separate incident report with the Department 1113 of State, detailing the resolution of the matter and identifying 1114 any measures that will avoid a future recurrence of the error. 1115 If the automatic tabulating equipment used in a recount is not 1116 part of the voting system and the ballots have already been 1117 processed through such equipment, the canvassing board is not 1118 required to put each ballot through any automatic tabulating 1119 equipment again. 1120 (b)âEach canvassing board responsible for conducting a 1121 recount where touchscreen ballots were used shall examine the 1122 counters on the precinct tabulators to ensure that the total of 1123 the returns on the precinct tabulators equals the overall 1124 election return. If there is a discrepancy between the overall 1125 election return and the counters of the precinct tabulators, the 1126 counters of the precinct tabulators shall be presumed correct 1127 and such votes shall be canvassed accordingly. 1128 (c)âThe canvassing board shall submit on forms or in 1129 formats provided by the division a second set of unofficial 1130 returns to the Department of State for each federal, statewide, 1131 state, or multicounty office or ballot measure. The returns 1132 shall be filed no later than 3 p.m. on the 5th day after any 1133 primary election and no later than 3 p.m. on the 9th day after 1134 any general election in which a recount was ordered by the 1135 Secretary of State. If the canvassing board is unable to 1136 complete the recount prescribed in this subsection by the 1137 deadline, the second set of unofficial returns submitted by the 1138 canvassing board shall be identical to the initial unofficial 1139 returns and the submission shall also include a detailed 1140 explanation of why it was unable to timely complete the recount. 1141 However, the canvassing board shall complete the recount 1142 prescribed in this subsection, along with any manual recount 1143 prescribed in s. 102.166, and certify election returns in 1144 accordance with the requirements of this chapter. 1145 (d)âThe Department of State shall adopt detailed rules 1146 prescribing additional recount procedures for each certified 1147 voting system, which shall be uniform to the extent practicable. 1148 (8)âThe canvassing board may employ such clerical help to 1149 assist with the work of the board as it deems necessary, with at 1150 least one member of the board present at all times, until the 1151 canvass of the returns is completed. The clerical help must 1152 shall be paid from the same fund as inspectors and other 1153 necessary election officials. 1154 (c)âThe canvassing board shall publish notice on the county 1155 website as provided in s. 50.0311, on the supervisor of 1156 electionsâ website, or once in one or more newspapers of general 1157 circulation in the county of the system validation review, 1158 including the date, time, and place of the review. Such review 1159 is open to the public. 1160 (d)âThe canvassing board shall submit on forms or in 1161 formats provided by the division a vote validation for each 1162 federal, statewide, state, or multicounty office or ballot 1163 measure in accordance with paragraph (5)(b). If the canvassing 1164 board is unable to complete the system validation review by the 1165 deadline, the vote validation report submitted by the canvassing 1166 board must be identical to the initial unofficial returns and 1167 the submission must also include a detailed explanation of the 1168 reason the board was unable to timely complete the system 1169 validation review. However, the canvassing board shall complete 1170 the system validation review prescribed in this subsection, 1171 along with any system validation review prescribed, and certify 1172 official election returns, in accordance with the requirements 1173 of this chapter. 1174 (e)âThe department shall adopt detailed rules prescribing 1175 additional system validation review procedures for each 1176 certified voting system which must be uniform to the extent 1177 practicable. 1178 (7)(9)âEach member, substitute member, and alternate member 1179 of the county canvassing board and all clerical help must wear 1180 identification badges during any period in which the county 1181 canvassing board is canvassing votes or engaging in other 1182 official duties. The identification badges should be worn in a 1183 conspicuous and unobstructed area, and include the name of the 1184 individual and his or her official position. 1185 (8)(a)(10)(a)âThe supervisor shall file a report with the 1186 Division of Elections on the conduct of the election no later 1187 than 20 business days after the Elections Canvassing Commission 1188 certifies the election. The report must, at a minimum, describe 1189 all of the following: 1190 1.âAll equipment or software malfunctions at the precinct 1191 level, at a counting location, or within computer and 1192 telecommunications networks supporting a county location, or 1193 issues encountered with any state-approved election system, 1194 including, but not limited to, vote tabulation systems and 1195 automated independent vote validation systems, and the steps 1196 that were taken to address the malfunctions. 1197 2.âAll election definition errors that were discovered 1198 after the logic and accuracy test, and the steps that were taken 1199 to address the errors. 1200 3.âAll ballot printing errors, vote-by-mail ballot mailing 1201 errors, or ballot supply problems, and the steps that were taken 1202 to address the errors or problems. 1203 4.âAll staffing shortages or procedural violations by 1204 employees or precinct workers which were addressed by the 1205 supervisor of elections or the county canvassing board during 1206 the conduct of the election, and the steps that were taken to 1207 correct such issues. 1208 5.âAll instances where needs for staffing or equipment were 1209 insufficient to meet the needs of the voters. 1210 6.âAny additional information regarding material issues or 1211 problems associated with the conduct of the election. 1212 (b)âIf a supervisor discovers new or additional information 1213 on any of the items required to be included in the report 1214 pursuant to paragraph (a) after the report is filed, the 1215 supervisor must notify the division that new information has 1216 been discovered no later than the next business day after the 1217 discovery, and the supervisor must file an amended report signed 1218 by the supervisor of elections on the conduct of the election 1219 within 10 days after the discovery. 1220 (c)âSuch reports must be maintained on file in the Division 1221 of Elections and must be available for public inspection. 1222 (d)âThe division shall review the conduct of election 1223 reports to determine what problems may be likely to occur in 1224 other elections and disseminate such information, along with 1225 possible solutions and training, to the supervisors of 1226 elections. 1227 (e)âFor the general election, the department shall submit 1228 the analysis of these reports for the post-general general 1229 election report as part of the consolidated reports required 1230 under ss. 101.591 and 101.595 to the Governor, the President of 1231 the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives by 1232 February 15 of each year following a general election. 1233 (11)âThe supervisor shall file with the department a copy 1234 of or an export file from the results database of the countyâs 1235 voting system and other statistical information as may be 1236 required by the department, the Legislature, or the Election 1237 Assistance Commission. The department shall adopt rules 1238 establishing the required content and acceptable formats for the 1239 filings and time for filings. 1240 Section 21.âSection 102.166, Florida Statutes, is amended 1241 to read: 1242 102.166âManual review recounts of overvotes and undervotes 1243 in contests.â 1244 (1)âIf the vote tabulation system indicates, and the 1245 automated independent vote validation process confirms, second 1246 set of unofficial returns pursuant to ss. 101.591 and 102.141, 1247 s. 102.141 indicates that a candidate for any office was 1248 defeated or eliminated by one-quarter of a percent or less of 1249 the votes cast for such office, that a candidate for retention 1250 to a judicial office was retained or not retained by one-quarter 1251 of a percent or less of the votes cast on the question of 1252 retention, or that a measure appearing on the ballot was 1253 approved or rejected by one-quarter of a percent or less of the 1254 votes cast on such measure, a manual review recount of the 1255 overvotes and undervotes cast in the entire geographic 1256 jurisdiction of such office or ballot measure must shall be 1257 ordered and conducted in a manner consistent with s. 102.141 1258 unless: 1259 (a)âThe candidate or candidates defeated or eliminated from 1260 contention by one-quarter of 1 percent or fewer of the votes 1261 cast for such office request in writing that a manual review 1262 recount not be made; or 1263 (b)âThe number of overvotes and undervotes is fewer than 1264 the number of votes needed to change the outcome of the 1265 election. 1266 1267 The Secretary of State is responsible for ordering such manual 1268 reviews in races that are a manual recount for federal or, state 1269 races that are multicounty, and any other multicounty races. The 1270 county canvassing board or local board responsible for 1271 certifying the election is responsible for ordering a manual 1272 review recount for all other races. A manual review recount 1273 consists of a review by a designee of the canvassing board 1274 recount of paper marksense ballots or of digital images from an 1275 independent vote validation system, if applicable of those 1276 ballots by a person. 1277 (2)âAny hardware or software used to identify and sort 1278 overvotes and undervotes for a given race or ballot measure must 1279 be certified by the Department of State. Any such hardware or 1280 software must be capable of simultaneously identifying and 1281 sorting overvotes and undervotes in multiple races while 1282 simultaneously counting votes. Overvotes and undervotes must be 1283 identified and sorted while conducting the vote validation 1284 process recounting ballots pursuant to s. 102.141. Overvotes and 1285 undervotes must may be identified and sorted physically or 1286 digitally. 1287 (3)âAny manual review must recount shall be open to the 1288 public. Each political party may designate one person with 1289 expertise in the computer field who shall be allowed in the 1290 central counting room when the manual review is being conducted 1291 and when the official votes are being counted. The designee may 1292 not interfere with the normal operation of the canvassing board. 1293 (4)(a)âA vote for a candidate or ballot measure shall be 1294 counted if there is a clear indication on the ballot that the 1295 voter has made a definite choice. 1296 (b)âThe Department of State shall adopt specific rules for 1297 the federal write-in absentee ballot and for each certified 1298 voting system prescribing what constitutes a âclear indication 1299 on the ballot that the voter has made a definite choice.â The 1300 rules must shall be consistent, to the extent practicable, and 1301 may not: 1302 1.âAuthorize the use of any electronic or electromechanical 1303 reading device to review a hybrid voting system ballot that is 1304 produced using a voter interface device and that contains both 1305 machine-readable fields and machine-printed text of the contest 1306 titles and voter selections, unless the printed text is 1307 illegible; 1308 2.âExclusively provide that the voter must properly mark or 1309 designate his or her choice on the ballot; or 1310 3.âContain a catch-all provision that fails to identify 1311 specific standards, such as âany other mark or indication 1312 clearly indicating that the voter has made a definite choice.â 1313 (c)âThe rule for the federal write-in absentee ballot must 1314 address, at a minimum, the following issues: 1315 1.âThe appropriate lines or spaces for designating a 1316 candidate choice and, for state and local races, the office or 1317 ballot measure to be voted, including the proximity of each to 1318 the other and the effect of intervening blank lines. 1319 2.âThe sufficiency of designating a candidateâs first or 1320 last name when no other candidate in the race has the same or a 1321 similar name. 1322 3.âThe sufficiency of designating a candidateâs first or 1323 last name when an opposing candidate has the same or a similar 1324 name, notwithstanding generational suffixes and titles such as 1325 âJr.,â âSr.,â or âIII.â The rule should contemplate the 1326 sufficiency of additional first names and first initials, middle 1327 names and middle initials, generational suffixes and titles, 1328 nicknames, and, in general elections, the name or abbreviation 1329 of a political party. 1330 4.âCandidate designations containing both a qualified 1331 candidateâs name and a political party, including those in which 1332 the party designated is the candidateâs party, is not the 1333 candidateâs party, has an opposing candidate in the race, or 1334 does not have an opposing candidate in the race. 1335 5.âSituations where the abbreviation or name of a candidate 1336 is the same as the abbreviation or name of a political party to 1337 which the candidate does not belong, including those in which 1338 the party designated has another candidate in the race or does 1339 not have a candidate in the race. 1340 6.âThe use of marks, symbols, or language, such as arrows, 1341 quotation marks, or the word âsameâ or âditto,â to indicate that 1342 the same political party designation applies to all listed 1343 offices or the electorâs approval or disapproval of all listed 1344 ballot measures. 1345 7.âSituations in which an elector designates the name of a 1346 qualified candidate for an incorrect office. 1347 8.âSituations in which an elector designates an otherwise 1348 correct office name that includes an incorrect district number. 1349 (5)âProcedures for a manual review recount are as follows: 1350 (a)âThe county canvassing board shall appoint as many 1351 counting teams of at least two electors as is necessary to 1352 manually review recount the ballots. A counting team must have, 1353 when possible, members of at least two political parties. A 1354 candidate involved in the race may shall not be a member of the 1355 counting team. 1356 (b)âEach duplicate ballot prepared pursuant to s. 1357 101.5614(4) must or s. 102.141(7) shall be compared with the 1358 original ballot to ensure the correctness of the duplicate. 1359 (c)âIf a counting team is unable to determine whether the 1360 ballot contains a clear indication that the voter has made a 1361 definite choice, the ballot must shall be presented to the 1362 county canvassing board for a determination. 1363 (d)âThe Department of State shall adopt detailed rules 1364 prescribing additional review recount procedures for each 1365 certified voting system which must shall be uniform to the 1366 extent practicable. At a minimum, the rules must shall address, 1367 at a minimum, the following areas: 1368 1.âSecurity of ballots during the manual review recount 1369 process; 1370 2.âTime and place of manual reviews recounts; 1371 3.âPublic observance of manual reviews recounts; 1372 4.âObjections to ballot determinations; 1373 5.âRecord of manual review recount proceedings; 1374 6.âProcedures relating to candidate and petitioner 1375 representatives; and 1376 7.âProcedures relating to the certification and the use of 1377 automatic tabulating equipment that is not part of a voting 1378 system. 1379 (6)âNothing in this section precludes a county canvassing 1380 board or local board involved in the manual review recount from 1381 comparing a digital image of a ballot to the corresponding 1382 physical paper ballot during a manual review recount. 1383 Section 22.âSection 104.51, Florida Statutes, is created to 1384 read: 1385 104.51âTime limitation; election fraud.âA prosecution for a 1386 felony violation under the Florida Election Code must be 1387 commenced within 5 years after the date the violation is 1388 committed. 1389 Section 23.âSection 322.034, Florida Statutes, is created 1390 to read: 1391 322.034âLegal status designation on state-issued driver 1392 licenses and identification cards.â 1393 (1)âBy July 1, 2027, a Florida driver license or Florida 1394 identification card issued to a qualified applicant who is a 1395 United States citizen as last recorded in the system must 1396 include his or her legal citizenship status at the time of new 1397 issuance, renewal, or replacement. 1398 (2)âNotwithstanding any other law, the department must, at 1399 no charge, issue a renewal or replacement driver license or 1400 identification card if a licensee or cardholder timely updates 1401 his or her legal status upon becoming a citizen of the United 1402 States as required in s. 322.19. 1403 Section 24.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1404 made by this act to section 98.075, Florida Statutes, in a 1405 reference thereto, subsection (6) of section 98.065, Florida 1406 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1407 98.065âRegistration list maintenance programs.â 1408 (6)âThe supervisor shall, at a minimum, conduct an annual 1409 review of voter registration records to identify registration 1410 records in which a voter is registered at an address that may 1411 not be an address of legal residence for the voter. For those 1412 registration records with such addresses that the supervisor has 1413 reasonable belief are not legal residential addresses, the 1414 supervisor shall initiate list maintenance activities pursuant 1415 to s. 98.075(6) and (7). 1416 Section 25.âThis act shall take effect January 1, 2027.